District of Columbia statutes.
25-761

Structural requirements.

No license shall be issued for the sale or consumption of beverages in any building, a part of which is used as a dwelling or lodging house, unless the applicant files an affidavit stating to the satisfaction of the Board that access from the portion of the building used as a dwelling or lodging house to the portion where the applicant desires to sell alcoholic beverages is effectively closed; provided, that the provisions of this section shall not apply to a hotel or a club licensed under this title. The Board, by regulation, may provide for waiver of the provisions of this section upon application of a licensee.

History

May 3, 2001, D.C. Law 13-298, § 101, 48 DCR 2959